Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1263.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 307. Prohibiting occupancy limits.(a) Prohibition.--A local government unit may not limit the number of individuals who may live together in a single dwelling based on familial relationship.(b) Exception.--A local government unit may limit the number of individuals who may live together in a single dwelling based only on demonstrated health and safety standards, including the International Building Code, International Residential Code and International Property Maintenance Code standards in effect on the effective date of this subsection, fire code regulations or Department of Environmental Protection wastewater and water 123456789101112131415161718 quality standards.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Familial relationship." An individual's connection to one or more other individuals through blood, marriage, adoption or foster care."Local government unit." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1263PN1629 - 2 - 123456789101112